Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2401
Highway Allocation Fund; created; investment.

There is hereby established the Highway Allocation Fund. There shall be paid into such fund the amounts disbursed from time to time from the Highway Trust Fund as provided by law together with such sums as may be appropriated thereto from the General Fund and proceeds of sales and use taxes credited to the Highway Allocation Fund under section 77-27,132. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1971, LB 53, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 599, § 12;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 37;

Laws 2006, LB 904, § 1.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.